Hawaii, session 2026, SB991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The department of health shall conduct a study on the adequacy of long-term care on the island of Molokai.  The study shall include but not be limited to: (1)  Identification of essential components to ensure the availability of a full continuum of long-term care services, including the need for long-term care facilities; and (2)  Exploration of funding options to support the provision of long-term care services, including the recruitment, training, and retention of a skilled workforce. (b) The department shall submit a report to the legislature of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the study on the adequacy of long-term care on the island of Molokai, required in section 1 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________